New York, session 2025-2026, A11561.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act enacts into law necessary legislation. Each compo- 2 nent is wholly contained within a Part identified as Parts A through F. 3 The effective date for each particular provision contained within such 4 Part is set forth in the last section of such Part. Any provision in any 5 section contained within a Part, including the effective date of the 6 Part, which makes a reference to a section "of this act", when used in 7 connection with that particular component, shall be deemed to mean and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD16058-03-6 A. 11561 2 1 refer to the corresponding section of the Part in which it is found. 2 Section three of this act sets forth the general effective date of this 3 act. 4 PART A 5 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 747 of the laws of 2023 amending the 6 public health law relating to establishing a four-year demonstration 7 project and workgroup to reduce the use of temporary staffing agencies 8 in residential healthcare facilities, as amended by chapter 27 of the 9 laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 10 § 2. 1. Notwithstanding the requirements of paragraph (c) of subdivi- 11 sion 1 and paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 of section 2828 of the public 12 health law, the commissioner of health shall establish a [four-year] 13 five-year (January 1, 2023 through [December 31, 2026] June 30, 2027) 14 demonstration project to reduce the use of temporary staffing agencies. 15 Any remittance or amounts owed to the state pursuant to subparagraph (i) 16 of paragraph (c) of subdivision 1 and paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 of 17 section 2828 of the public health law, including, but not limited to, 18 amounts owed relating to excess revenue, or the difference between the 19 minimum spending requirement and the actual amount of spending on resi- 20 dent-facing staffing or direct care staffing, as the case may be, shall 21 be reduced as follows for reporting periods beginning on January 1, 2023 22 and ending on [December 31, 2026] June 30, 2027, and, to the extent the 23 demonstration project continues, years thereafter: 24 (A) a fifty percent reduction, if a residential healthcare facility 25 which has a fifty percent or lower use of resident-facing staffing 26 contracted out to a temporary staffing agency for services provided by 27 registered professional nurses, licensed practical nurses, or certified 28 nurse aides, has reduced its use of such contracted agency services by 29 at least thirty percent during any year in which such remittance or 30 amounts owed to the state are payable, as measured by paragraph (C) of 31 this subdivision. 32 (B) a twenty-five percent reduction, if a residential healthcare 33 facility which has a fifty percent or lower use of resident-facing 34 staffing contracted out to a temporary staffing agency for services 35 provided by registered professional nurses, licensed practical nurses, 36 or certified nurse aides, has reduced its use of such contracted agency 37 services by at least twenty percent, but less than thirty percent, 38 during any year in which such remittance or amounts owed to the state 39 are payable, as measured by paragraph (C) of this subdivision. 40 (C) In measuring temporary staffing agency usage for purposes of 41 determining the reductions provided for in this section, the following 42 measuring periods shall apply: in 2023, the fourth calendar quarter of 43 2022 shall be compared to the fourth calendar quarter of 2023; in 2027, 44 the second calendar quarter of 2026 shall be compared to the second 45 calendar quarter of 2027; for 2024 and other years thereafter, the aver- 46 age of the [4] four calendar quarters of the previous year shall be 47 compared to the average of the four calendar quarters of the current 48 year. Temporary staffing shall be measured using the publicly available 49 U.S. Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) Payroll Based 50 Journal (PBJ) facility reported data. 51 2. (A) For the first year of the demonstration project established 52 pursuant to this section, the definition of "revenue" as defined in 53 paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 of section 2828 of the public health law 54 shall exclude all revenue, other than total Medicaid operating revenue, A. 11561 3 1 if, in the fourth quarter of 2023, a residential health care facility 2 uses ten percent or less of its resident-facing staffing who are 3 contracted out to a temporary staffing agency for services provided by 4 registered professional nurses, licensed practical nurses, or certified 5 nurse aides. 6 (B) For the second year of the demonstration project established 7 pursuant to this section, all revenue, other than total Medicaid operat- 8 ing revenue, if, in 2024, a residential health care facility uses nine 9 percent or less of its resident-facing staffing who are contracted out 10 to a temporary staffing agency for services provided by registered 11 professional nurses, licensed practical nurses, or certified nurse 12 aides; and 13 (C) [for] For the third [and], fourth, and fifth years, respectively, 14 and, to the extent the demonstration project continues, years thereaft- 15 er, respectively, of the demonstration project established pursuant to 16 this section, all revenue, other than total Medicaid operating revenue, 17 if, in 2025 [and], 2026, and 2027 respectively, and, to the extent the 18 demonstration project continues, years thereafter, respectively, a resi- 19 dential health care facility uses eight percent or less of its resi- 20 dent-facing staffing who are contracted out to a temporary staffing 21 agency for services provided by registered professional nurses, licensed 22 practical nurses, or certified nurse aides. 23 3. For purposes of implementing the demonstration program, after a 24 determination by the commissioner of health that a residential health 25 care facility is not in compliance with paragraph (c) of subdivision 1 26 of section 2828 of the public health law, but prior to the remittance or 27 payment of any funds by such facility, a residential health care facili- 28 ty shall submit documentation to the commissioner of health that it has 29 met the provisions of the demonstration project. Such documentation 30 shall be supported by a verification by a certified public accountant 31 that, based on the PBJ facility reported data and other necessary 32 supporting documentation, such facility is eligible for a reduction in 33 payments pursuant to this section. Upon receipt of such documentation 34 and verification, the commissioner will reduce any payments pursuant to 35 this section. 36 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. 37 PART B 38 Section 1. (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regu- 39 lation to the contrary, any site for which (i) a brownfield cleanup 40 agreement with the department of environmental conservation was entered 41 into prior to January 21, 2005 with respect to a site located at 1800 42 Park Avenue, between East 124th and East 125th Streets in East Harlem, 43 New York County, and (ii) which received a certificate of completion on 44 or before October 24, 2016, shall be a qualified site for purposes of 45 the brownfield redevelopment tax credits available to such a site pursu- 46 ant to section 21 of the tax law as in effect for such a site as of the 47 effective date of this act provided that both the site preparation cred- 48 it component and the on-site groundwater remediation credit component 49 shall be allowed for all eligible costs incurred on such a site prior to 50 and within the tax year in which qualified tangible property on such a 51 site is placed in service, and for a five year period (60 months) 52 following the year such property is first placed in service upon such a 53 site, provided, such a date occurs prior to the 2031 tax year, and the 54 tangible property credit component shall be allowed for all eligible A. 11561 4 1 costs incurred on such a site prior to and within the tax year in which 2 qualified tangible property on such a site is placed in service, and for 3 a ten year period (120 months) following the year such property is first 4 placed in service upon such a site, provided such a date occurs prior to 5 the 2031 tax year. 6 (b) In addition, any site for which (i) a brownfield cleanup agreement 7 with the department of environmental conservation was entered into prior 8 to January 21, 2005 with respect to a site located at 1800 Park Avenue, 9 between East 124th and East 125th Streets in East Harlem, New York Coun- 10 ty, and (ii) which received a certificate of completion on or before 11 October 24, 2016, shall be eligible to claim the tax credit for remedi- 12 ated brownfields available to such a site pursuant to section 22 of the 13 tax law as in effect for such a site as of the effective date of this 14 act provided the benefit period as applicable thereto shall be deemed to 15 be a ten-consecutive-tax-year period beginning with the tax year in 16 which qualified tangible property on such a site is placed in service 17 where said benefit period shall begin no later than the 2031 tax year. 18 (c) Further, any site for which (i) a brownfield cleanup agreement 19 with the department of environmental conservation was entered into prior 20 to January 21, 2005 with respect to a site located at 1800 Park Avenue, 21 between East 124th and East 125th Streets in East Harlem, New York Coun- 22 ty, and (ii) which received a certificate of completion on or before 23 October 24, 2016, shall be a qualified site for purposes of claiming the 24 tax credit for remediated brownfields available to such a site pursuant 25 to section 22 of the tax law, provided that such developer as defined 26 under section 22 of the tax law has purchased or in any other way has 27 been conveyed all or any portion of such a site from any other party who 28 or which has been issued a certificate of completion with respect to 29 such site and further provided that such purchase or conveyance occurs 30 no later than the 2031 tax year. 31 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. 32 PART C 33 Section 1. Section 7 of part MM of a chapter of the laws of 2026 34 amending the general municipal law and the executive law relating to 35 extending the term and authority of the independent monitor for the 36 Orange county industrial development agency, and modifying the applica- 37 bility of certain tax exemptions based on population, as proposed in 38 legislative bill numbers S. 9005-C and A. 10005-C, is amended to read as 39 follows: 40 § 7. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 41 the amendments to subdivisions 2, 3, 4 and 8 of section 912-b of the 42 general municipal law made by section two of this act and the amendments 43 to subdivision 8 of section 54 of the executive law made by section 44 three of this act shall not affect the repeal of such subdivisions and 45 shall be deemed to expire therewith; and provided further, however, that 46 subdivisions 5, 6 and 7 of section 912-b of the general municipal law as 47 added by section two of this act and section four of this act and the 48 amendments to subparagraph 5 of paragraph (d) of section 1411 of the 49 not-for-profit corporation law made by section six of this act shall 50 expire and be deemed repealed on the same date and in the same manner as 51 part III of chapter 58 of the laws of 2023[, takes effect]. 52 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. 53 PART D A. 11561 5 1 Section 1. Paragraph 3 of subdivision (a) of section 1212-a of the tax 2 law, as amended by chapter 345 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 (3) a tax, at the same uniform rate, but at a rate not to exceed four 5 and one-half per centum, in multiples of one-half of one per centum, on 6 the receipts from every sale of any or all of the following services in 7 whole or in part: credit rating, credit reporting, credit adjustment and 8 collection services, including, but not limited to, those services 9 provided by mercantile and consumer credit rating or reporting bureaus 10 or agencies and credit adjustment or collection bureaus or agencies, 11 whether rendered in written or oral form or in any other manner, except 12 to the extent otherwise taxable under article twenty-eight of this chap- 13 ter; notwithstanding the foregoing, collection services shall not 14 include those services performed by a law office or a law and collection 15 office, the maintenance or conduct of which constitutes the practice of 16 law, if the services are performed by an attorney at law who has been 17 duly licensed and admitted to practice law in this state. The local law 18 imposing the taxes authorized by this paragraph may provide for exclu- 19 sions and exemptions in addition to those provided for in such para- 20 graph. Provided, however, that the tax hereby authorized shall not be 21 imposed after November thirtieth, two thousand [twenty-six] twenty-nine. 22 § 2. Subsection (a) of section 1301 of the tax law, as amended by 23 chapter 345 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 24 (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any 25 city in this state having a population of one million or more inhabit- 26 ants, acting through its local legislative body, is hereby authorized 27 and empowered to adopt and amend local laws imposing in any such city, 28 for taxable years beginning after nineteen hundred seventy-five: 29 (1) a tax on the personal income of residents of such city, at the 30 rates provided for under subsection (a) of section thirteen hundred four 31 of this article for taxable years beginning before two thousand [twen- 32 ty-seven] thirty, and at the rates provided for under subsection (b) of 33 section thirteen hundred four of this article for taxable years begin- 34 ning after two thousand [twenty-six] twenty-nine, provided, however, 35 that if, for any taxable year beginning after two thousand [twenty-six] 36 twenty-nine, the rates set forth in such subsection (b) are rendered 37 inapplicable and the rates set forth in such subsection (a) are rendered 38 applicable, then the tax for such taxable year shall be at the rates 39 provided under subparagraphs (A) of paragraphs one, two and three of 40 such subsection (a), 41 (2) for taxable years beginning after nineteen hundred seventy-six, a 42 separate tax on the ordinary income portion of lump sum distributions of 43 such residents, at the rates provided for herein, such taxes to be 44 administered, collected and distributed by the commissioner as provided 45 for in this article. 46 § 3. Subsection (b) of section 1304 of the tax law, as amended by 47 chapter 345 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 48 (b) A tax other than the city separate tax on the ordinary income 49 portion of lump sum distributions imposed pursuant to the authority of 50 section thirteen hundred one of this article shall be determined as 51 follows: 52 (1) Resident married individuals filing joint returns and resident 53 surviving spouses. The tax under this section for each taxable year on 54 the city taxable income of every city resident married individual who 55 makes a single return jointly with [his or her] such individual's spouse 56 under subsection (b) of section thirteen hundred six of this article and A. 11561 6 1 on the city taxable income of every city resident surviving spouse shall 2 be determined in accordance with the following table: 3 For taxable years beginning after two thousand [twenty-six] twenty- 4 nine: 5 If the city taxable income is: The tax is: 6 Not over $21,600 1.18% of the city taxable income 7 Over $21,600 but not $255 plus 1.435% of excess 8 over $45,000 over $21,600 9 Over $45,000 but not $591 plus 1.455% of excess 10 over $90,000 over $45,000 11 Over $90,000 $1,245 plus 1.48% of excess 12 over $90,000 13 (2) Resident heads of households. The tax under this section for each 14 taxable year on the city taxable income of every city resident head of a 15 household shall be determined in accordance with the following table: 16 For taxable years beginning after two thousand [twenty-six] twenty- 17 nine: 18 If the city taxable income is: The tax is: 19 Not over $14,400 1.18% of the city taxable income 20 Over $14,400 but not $170 plus 1.435% of excess 21 over $30,000 over $14,400 22 Over $30,000 but not $394 plus 1.455% of excess 23 over $60,000 over $30,000 24 Over $60,000 $830 plus 1.48% of excess 25 over $60,000 26 (3) Resident unmarried individuals, resident married individuals 27 filing separate returns and resident estates and trusts. The tax under 28 this section for each taxable year on the city taxable income of every 29 city resident individual who is not a city resident married individual 30 who makes a single return jointly with [his or her] such individual's 31 spouse under subsection (b) of section thirteen hundred six of this 32 article or a city resident head of household or a city resident surviv- 33 ing spouse, and on the city taxable income of every city resident estate 34 and trust shall be determined in accordance with the following table: 35 For taxable years beginning after two thousand [twenty-six] twenty- 36 nine: 37 If the city taxable income is: The tax is: 38 Not over $12,000 1.18% of the city taxable income 39 Over $12,000 but not $142 plus 1.435% of excess 40 over $25,000 over $12,000 41 Over $25,000 but not $328 plus 1.455% of excess 42 over $50,000 over $25,000 43 Over $50,000 $692 plus 1.48% of excess 44 over $50,000 45 § 4. Subsection (a) of section 1304-B of the tax law, as amended by 46 chapter 345 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 47 (a) (1) In addition to any other taxes authorized by this article, any 48 city imposing such taxes is hereby authorized and empowered to adopt and A. 11561 7 1 amend local laws imposing in any such city for each taxable year begin- 2 ning after nineteen hundred ninety but before two thousand [twenty-sev- 3 en] thirty, an additional tax on the city taxable income of every city 4 resident individual, estate and trust, to be calculated for each taxable 5 year as follows: (i) for each taxable year beginning after nineteen 6 hundred ninety but before nineteen hundred ninety-nine, at the rate of 7 fourteen percent of the sum of the taxes for each such taxable year 8 determined pursuant to section thirteen hundred four and section thir- 9 teen hundred four-A of this article; and (ii) for each taxable year 10 beginning after nineteen hundred ninety-eight, at the rate of fourteen 11 percent of the tax for such taxable year determined pursuant to such 12 section thirteen hundred four. 13 (2) Notwithstanding paragraph one of this subsection, for each taxable 14 year beginning after nineteen hundred ninety-nine but before two thou- 15 sand [twenty-seven] thirty, any city imposing such additional tax may by 16 local law impose such tax at a rate that is less than fourteen percent 17 and may impose such tax at more than one rate depending upon the filing 18 status and city taxable income of such city resident individual, estate 19 or trust. 20 (3) A local law enacted pursuant to paragraph two of this subsection 21 shall be applicable with respect to any taxable year only if it has been 22 enacted on or before July thirty-first of such year. A certified copy of 23 such local law shall be mailed by registered mail to the department at 24 its office in Albany within fifteen days of its enactment. However, the 25 department may allow additional time for such certified copy to be 26 mailed if it deems such action to be consistent with its duties under 27 this article. 28 § 5. Paragraph E of subdivision 1 of section 11-604 of the administra- 29 tive code of the city of New York, as amended by chapter 345 of the laws 30 of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 31 E. For taxable years beginning on or after January first, nineteen 32 hundred seventy-eight but before January first, two thousand [twenty- 33 seven] thirty, the tax imposed by subdivision one of section 11-603 of 34 this subchapter shall be, in the case of each taxpayer: 35 (a) whichever of the following amounts is the greatest: 36 (1) an amount computed, for taxable years beginning before nineteen 37 hundred eighty-seven, at the rate of nine per centum, and for taxable 38 years beginning after nineteen hundred eighty-six, at the rate of eight 39 and eighty-five one-hundredths per centum, of its entire net income or 40 the portion of such entire net income allocated within the city as here- 41 inafter provided, subject to any modification required by paragraphs (d) 42 and (e) of subdivision three of this section, 43 (2) an amount computed at one and one-half mills for each dollar of 44 its total business and investment capital, or the portion thereof allo- 45 cated within the city, as hereinafter provided, except that in the case 46 of a cooperative housing corporation as defined in the internal revenue 47 code, the applicable rate shall be four-tenths of one mill, 48 (3) an amount computed, for taxable years beginning before nineteen 49 hundred eighty-seven, at the rate of nine per centum, and for taxable 50 years beginning after nineteen hundred eighty-six, at the rate of eight 51 and eighty-five one-hundredths per centum, on thirty per centum of the 52 taxpayer's entire net income plus salaries and other compensation paid 53 to the taxpayer's elected or appointed officers and to every stockholder 54 owning in excess of five per centum of its issued capital stock minus 55 fifteen thousand dollars (subject to proration as hereinafter provided) 56 and any net loss for the reported year, or on the portion of any such A. 11561 8 1 sum allocated within the city as hereinafter provided for the allocation 2 of entire net income, subject to any modification required by paragraphs 3 (d) and (e) of subdivision three of this section, provided, however, 4 that for taxable years beginning on or after July first, nineteen 5 hundred ninety-six, the provisions of paragraph H of this subdivision 6 shall apply for purposes of the computation under this clause, or 7 (4) for taxable years ending on or before June thirtieth, nineteen 8 hundred eighty-nine, one hundred twenty-five dollars, for taxable years 9 ending after June thirtieth, nineteen hundred eighty-nine and beginning 10 before two thousand nine, three hundred dollars, and for taxable years 11 beginning after two thousand eight: 12 If New York city receipts are: Fixed dollar minimum tax is: 13 Not more than $100,000 $25 14 More than $100,000 but not over $250,000 $75 15 More than $250,000 but not over $500,000 $175 16 More than $500,000 but not over $1,000,000 $500 17 More than $1,000,000 but not over $5,000,000 $1,500 18 More than $5,000,000 but not over $25,000,000 $3,500 19 Over $25,000,000 $5,000 20 For purposes of this clause, New York city receipts are the receipts 21 computed in accordance with subparagraph two of paragraph (a) of subdi- 22 vision three of this section for the taxable year. For taxable years 23 beginning after two thousand eight, if the taxable year is less than 24 twelve months, the amount prescribed by this clause shall be reduced by 25 twenty-five percent if the period for which the taxpayer is subject to 26 tax is more than six months but not more than nine months and by fifty 27 percent if the period for which the taxpayer is subject to tax is not 28 more than six months. If the taxable year is less than twelve months, 29 the amount of New York city receipts for purposes of this clause is 30 determined by dividing the amount of the receipts for the taxable year 31 by the number of months in the taxable year and multiplying the result 32 by twelve, plus; 33 (b) an amount computed at the rate of three-quarters of a mill for 34 each dollar of the portion of its subsidiary capital allocated within 35 the city as hereinafter provided. 36 In the case of a taxpayer which is not subject to tax for an entire 37 year, the exemption allowed in clause three of subparagraph (a) of this 38 paragraph shall be prorated according to the period such taxpayer was 39 subject to tax. Provided, however, that this paragraph shall not apply 40 to taxable years beginning after December thirty-first, two thousand 41 [twenty-six] twenty-nine. For the taxable years specified in the 42 preceding sentence, the tax imposed by subdivision one of section 11-603 43 of this subchapter shall be, in the case of each taxpayer, determined as 44 specified in paragraph A of this subdivision, provided, however, that 45 the provisions of paragraphs G and H of this subdivision shall apply for 46 purposes of the computation under clause three of subparagraph (a) of 47 such paragraph A. 48 § 6. The opening paragraph of section 11-1701 of the administrative 49 code of the city of New York, as amended by chapter 345 of the laws of 50 2023, is amended to read as follows: 51 A tax is hereby imposed on the city taxable income of every city resi- 52 dent individual, estate and trust determined in accordance with the 53 rates set forth in subdivision (a) of this section for taxable years 54 beginning before two thousand [twenty-seven] thirty, and in accordance 55 with the rates set forth in subdivision (b) of this section for taxable 56 years beginning after two thousand [twenty-six] twenty-nine. Provided, A. 11561 9 1 however, that if, for any taxable year beginning after two thousand 2 [twenty-six] twenty-nine, the rates set forth in such subdivision (b) 3 are rendered inapplicable and the rates set forth in such subdivision 4 (a) are rendered applicable, then the tax for such taxable year shall be 5 at the rates provided under subparagraph (A) of paragraphs one, two and 6 three of such subdivision (a). 7 § 7. Subdivision (b) of section 11-1701 of the administrative code of 8 the city of New York, as amended by chapter 345 of the laws of 2023, is 9 amended to read as follows: 10 (b) Rate of tax. A tax imposed pursuant to this section shall be 11 determined as follows: 12 (1) Resident married individuals filing joint returns and resident 13 surviving spouses. The tax under this section for each taxable year on 14 the city taxable income of every city resident married individual who 15 makes a single return jointly with [his or her] such individual's spouse 16 under subdivision (b) of section 11-1751 of this title and on the city 17 taxable income of every city resident surviving spouse shall be deter- 18 mined in accordance with the following table: 19 For taxable years beginning after two thousand [twenty-six] twenty- 20 nine: 21 If the city taxable income is: The tax is: 22 Not over $21,600 1.18% of the city taxable income 23 Over $21,600 but not $255 plus 1.435% of excess 24 over $45,000 over $21,600 25 Over $45,000 but not $591 plus 1.455% of excess 26 over $90,000 over $45,000 27 Over $90,000 $1,245 plus 1.48% of excess 28 over $90,000 29 (2) Resident heads of households. The tax under this section for each 30 taxable year on the city taxable income of every city resident head of a 31 household shall be determined in accordance with the following table: 32 For taxable years beginning after two thousand [twenty-six] twenty- 33 nine: 34 If the city taxable income is: The tax is: 35 Not over $14,400 1.18% of the city taxable income 36 Over $14,400 but not $170 plus 1.435% of excess 37 over $30,000 over $14,400 38 Over $30,000 but not $394 plus 1.455% of excess 39 over $60,000 over $30,000 40 Over $60,000 $830 plus 1.48% of excess 41 over $60,000 42 (3) Resident unmarried individuals, resident married individuals 43 filing separate returns and resident estates and trusts. The tax under 44 this section for each taxable year on the city taxable income of every 45 city resident individual who is not a married individual who makes a 46 single return jointly with [his or her] such individual's spouse under 47 subdivision (b) of section 11-1751 of this title or a city resident head 48 of a household or a city resident surviving spouse, and on the city 49 taxable income of every city resident estate and trust shall be deter- 50 mined in accordance with the following table: 51 For taxable years beginning after two thousand [twenty-six] twenty- 52 nine: A. 11561 10 1 If the city taxable income is: The tax is: 2 Not over $12,000 1.18% of the city taxable income 3 Over $12,000 but not $142 plus 1.435% of excess 4 over $25,000 over $12,000 5 Over $25,000 but not $328 plus 1.455% of excess 6 over $50,000 over $25,000 7 Over $50,000 $692 plus 1.48% of excess 8 over $50,000 9 § 8. Paragraph 1 of subdivision (a) of section 11-1704.1 of the admin- 10 istrative code of the city of New York, as amended by chapter 345 of the 11 laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 12 (1) In addition to any other taxes imposed by this chapter, there is 13 hereby imposed for each taxable year beginning after nineteen hundred 14 ninety but before two thousand [twenty-seven] thirty, an additional tax 15 on the city taxable income of every city resident individual, estate and 16 trust, to be calculated for each taxable year as follows: (i) for each 17 taxable year beginning after nineteen hundred ninety but before nineteen 18 hundred ninety-nine, at the rate of fourteen percent of the sum of the 19 taxes for each such taxable year determined pursuant to section 11-1701 20 and section 11-1704 of this subchapter; and (ii) for each taxable year 21 beginning after nineteen hundred ninety-eight, at the rate of fourteen 22 percent of the tax for such taxable year determined pursuant to such 23 section 11-1701. 24 § 9. Subdivision (a) of section 11-2002 of the administrative code of 25 the city of New York, as amended by chapter 345 of the laws of 2023, is 26 amended to read as follows: 27 (a) There are hereby imposed and there shall be paid sales taxes at 28 the rate of four and one-half percent on receipts from every sale of the 29 services of beauty, barbering, hair restoring, manicuring, pedicuring, 30 electrolysis, massage services and similar services, and every sale of 31 services by weight control salons, health salons, gymnasiums, turkish 32 and sauna bath and similar establishments and every charge for the use 33 of such facilities, whether or not any tangible personal property is 34 transferred in conjunction therewith; but excluding services rendered by 35 a physician, osteopath, dentist, nurse, physiotherapist, chiropractor, 36 podiatrist, optometrist, ophthalmic dispenser or a person performing 37 similar services licensed under title eight of the education law, as 38 amended, and excluding such services when performed on pets and other 39 animals, as authorized by subdivision (a) of section twelve hundred 40 twelve-A of the tax law. Provided, however, that the tax hereby imposed 41 shall not be imposed after November thirtieth, two thousand [twenty-six] 42 twenty-nine. 43 § 10. The opening paragraph of subdivision (a) of section 11-2040 of 44 the administrative code of the city of New York, as amended by chapter 45 345 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 46 There is hereby imposed within the city and there shall be paid a tax 47 at the rate of four and one-half percent upon the receipts from every 48 sale, except for resale, of the following services, provided, however, 49 that the tax hereby imposed shall not be imposed after November thirti- 50 eth, two thousand [twenty-six] twenty-nine, on receipts from sales of 51 the services specified in paragraph one of this subdivision: 52 § 11. Section 4 of chapter 877 of the laws of 1975, relating to the 53 imposition of certain taxes in the city of New York, as amended by chap- 54 ter 345 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: A. 11561 11 1 § 4. This act shall expire on December 31, [2026] 2029, provided, 2 however, that it is hereby declared to be the express intention of the 3 legislature that the provisions of sections two and three of this act, 4 except with respect to the enforcement and collection of any tax arising 5 thereunder, shall remain in full force and effect only until the date of 6 such expiration, at which time the provisions of law amended by this act 7 shall be continued in full force and effect as they existed prior to the 8 enactment of this act. 9 § 12. Section 6 of chapter 884 of the laws of 1975, relating to the 10 imposition of certain taxes in the city of New York, as amended by chap- 11 ter 345 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 12 § 6. This act shall expire on December 31, [2026] 2029, provided, 13 however, that it is hereby declared to be the express intention of the 14 legislature that the provisions of sections two, three and four of this 15 act, except with respect to the enforcement and collection of any tax 16 arising thereunder, shall remain in full force and effect only until the 17 date of such expiration, at which time the provisions of law amended by 18 this act shall be continued in full force and effect as they existed 19 prior to the enactment of this act. 20 § 13. Section 2 of chapter 882 of the laws of 1977, relating to the 21 imposition of certain taxes in the city of New York, as amended by chap- 22 ter 345 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 23 § 2. This act shall expire on December 31, [2026] 2029, provided, 24 however, that it is hereby declared to be the express intention of the 25 legislature that the provisions of section one of this act, except with 26 respect to the enforcement and collection of any tax arising thereunder, 27 shall remain in full force and effect only until the date of such expi- 28 ration, at which time the provisions of law amended by this act shall be 29 continued in full force and effect as they existed prior to the enact- 30 ment of this act. 31 § 14. This act shall take effect immediately. 32 PART E 33 Section 1. Subdivision (f) of section 11-3206 of the administrative 34 code of the city of New York, as added by section 3 of part HH of chap- 35 ter 59 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 36 (f) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an application shall 37 be filed, and the tax commission shall review an application in the same 38 manner and between the same dates as an application for review of an 39 assessment pursuant to sections one hundred sixty-four, one hundred 40 sixty-four-a, one hundred sixty-four-b, one hundred sixty-five, one 41 hundred sixty-six, and fifteen hundred twelve of the New York city char- 42 ter and subchapter one of chapter two of this title. Notwithstanding any 43 other provision of law to the contrary, where an application is filed 44 for review of the market value of real estate for the fiscal year begin- 45 ning July first, two thousand twenty-six, such application may be filed 46 between the date on which a notice of surcharge is issued to an owner of 47 a covered property, or, in the case of a residential cooperative proper- 48 ty, to a cooperative corporation, and the last date on which an applica- 49 tion may be filed pursuant to this section for review of the market 50 value of a covered property for the fiscal year beginning July first, 51 two thousand twenty-seven, and the tax commission shall review an appli- 52 cation filed pursuant to this section for review of the market value of 53 a covered property for the fiscal year beginning July first, two thou- 54 sand [twenty-eight] twenty-six, in the same manner and between the same A. 11561 12 1 dates as an application filed pursuant to this section for review of the 2 market value of real estate for the fiscal year beginning July first, 3 two thousand twenty-seven. 4 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 5 manner as section 3 of part HH of chapter 59 of the laws of 2026, took 6 effect; provided, however, that the amendments to section 11-3206 of the 7 administrative code of the city of New York made by section one of this 8 act shall not affect the expiration and repeal of such section and shall 9 be deemed repealed therewith. 10 PART F 11 Section 1. Paragraph (e) of subdivision 1 of section 1352 of the 12 racing, pari-mutuel wagering and breeding law, as added by section 1 of 13 part R of chapter 58 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 14 (e) For any gaming facility that qualifies under subdivision two of 15 section thirteen hundred twenty-one-a of this article, is licensed under 16 title two-A of this article, and is located within New York City, upon 17 receiving tax payments from such gaming facility, the commission shall 18 estimate and may forward from such receipts such amount due to maintain 19 racing support payments pursuant to section thirteen hundred fifty-five 20 of this title and remaining tax revenues shall be distributed in the 21 following manner: 22 (i) Eighty percent of all remaining deposits in a state fiscal year 23 resulting from taxes imposed by this article, and any interest and 24 penalties imposed by the commission relating to those taxes, shall be 25 deposited in the same manner as in subparagraph (i) of paragraph (d) of 26 this subdivision. For the first fiscal year of gaming facility oper- 27 ations, the hold harmless amount shall reflect a pro-rata amount based 28 on the opening date of the gaming facility. 29 (ii) Twenty percent of all remaining deposits in a state fiscal year 30 resulting from taxes imposed by this article, and any interest and 31 penalties imposed by the commission relating to those taxes, shall be 32 deposited to a sole custody fund established under the gaming commis- 33 sion, and paid monthly, without appropriation, directly to the metropol- 34 itan transportation authority commercial gaming revenue fund established 35 under section one thousand two hundred seventy-j of the public authori- 36 ties law until the applicable education aid hold harmless amount as 37 prescribed in subparagraph (i) of paragraph (d) of this subdivision has 38 been met. 39 (iii) Once the remaining deposits from a qualifying gaming facility as 40 prescribed in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph exceed the education 41 aid hold harmless amount as determined in subparagraph (i) of paragraph 42 (d) of this subdivision in a given state fiscal year, all subsequent 43 remaining deposits in such state fiscal year from taxes imposed by this 44 article, and any interest and penalties imposed by the commission relat- 45 ing to those taxes, shall be deposited to a sole custody fund estab- 46 lished under the gaming commission, and paid monthly, without appropri- 47 ation, directly to the metropolitan transportation authority commercial 48 gaming revenue fund established under section one thousand two hundred 49 seventy-j of the public authorities law; provided however, that once the 50 dollar amount paid directly to the metropolitan transportation authority 51 commercial gaming revenue fund established under section one thousand 52 two hundred seventy-j of the public authorities law matches the same 53 dollar amount paid pursuant to the education aid hold harmless amount as 54 determined in subparagraph (i) of paragraph (d) of this subdivision in a A. 11561 13 1 given state fiscal year, fifty percent of any excess dollar amounts 2 shall be deposited to a sole custody fund established under the gaming 3 commission, and paid monthly, without appropriation, directly to the 4 metropolitan transportation authority commercial gaming revenue fund 5 established under section one thousand two hundred seventy-j of the 6 public authorities law, and fifty percent of any excess dollar amounts 7 shall be deposited by the commission into the commercial gaming revenue 8 fund established under section ninety-seven-nnnn of the state finance 9 law for the sole purposes of education aid. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 11 deemed repealed one year after such effective date. 12 § 2. Severability clause. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivi- 13 sion, section or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of 14 competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, 15 impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in 16 its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section 17 or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which such judg- 18 ment shall have been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of 19 the legislature that this act would have been enacted even if such 20 invalid provisions had not been included herein. 21 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately provided, however, that 22 the applicable effective date of Parts A through F of this act shall be 23 as specifically set forth in the last section of such Parts.